Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1603
Law enforcement agency or prosecuting authority; seized property; prohibited acts.

No law enforcement agency or prosecuting authority of this state or its political subdivisions shall transfer or refer any money or property to a federal law enforcement authority or other federal agency by any means unless:

(1) The money or property seized exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars in currency or value;

(2) The money or property is physically seized by a federal agent who is employed by the federal government; or

(3) The person from whom the money or property was seized is the subject of a federal prosecution or the facts and circumstances surrounding the money or property seized are the subject of a federal prosecution.

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 13.